Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 260 Marketing of Agricultural Products

260.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Experiment station” means the agricultural experiment station.

“Hay” means grass, alfalfa, clover, or other forage crop cut and dried as fodder.

“Producer” means a person who cultivates or harvests hay or other agricultural products for sale.

History.

42c-3a, 1905a-30: amend. Acts 1988, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2006, ch. 35, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Department of agriculture, KRS ch. 246.

Foods, drugs and poisons, KRS ch. 217.

Promotion of agriculture and horticulture, KRS ch. 247.